Maryland, session 2025, HB1011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
1–202.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PRIVATE DETENTION FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY
THAT IS OWNED, MANAGED, OR OPERATED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PRIVATE
ENTITY UNDER A CONTRACT, AN AGREEMENT, OR A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH ANOTHER PRIVATE ENTITY, THE STATE, A POLITICAL
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1011*

HOUSE BILL 1011
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, OR THE UNITED STATES GOVERNMENT TO HOUSE OR
DETAIN INDIVIDUALS IN RELATION TO A VIOLATION OF STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT DEPRIVE AN INDIVIDUAL HOUSED OR DETAINED IN
A PRIVATE DETENTION FACILITY OF ANY RIGHT, PRIVILEGE, OR IMMUNITY SECURED
OR PROTECTED BY THE UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION, THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION, THE MARYLAND DECLARATION OF RIGHTS, OR ANY STATE OR
FEDERAL LAW.
(C) (1) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE
CONDUCT THAT CONSTITUTES A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(2) TO INVESTIGATE A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE OF
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY:
(I) ISSUE SUBPOENAS;
(II) ADMINISTER OATHS;
(III) COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY OF WITNESSES;
(IV) COMPEL PRODUCTION OF RECORDS, BOOKS, PAPERS,
CONTRACTS, AND OTHER DOCUMENTS;
(V) ENTER A PRIVATE DETENTION FACILITY AND ANY AREA
WITHIN A PRIVATE DETENTION FACILITY; AND
(VI) CONDUCT PRIVATE INTERVIEWS WITH ANY INDIVIDUAL
DETAINED IN A PRIVATE DETENTION FACILITY.
(3) A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SERVED
BY:
(I) CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED;
(II) ANY ADULT WHO IS NOT A PARTY TO THE PROCEEDING; OR
(III) THE SHERIFF OR DEPUTY SHERIFF OF THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE SUBPOENA IS ISSUED.
(4) IF A PERSON FAILS OR REFUSES TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA,
THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY APPLY TO A CIRCUIT COURT IN THE
COUNTY IN WHICH THE SUBPOENA WAS SERVED TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE.

HOUSE BILL 1011 3
(D) IF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FINDS THAT A VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION HAS OCCURRED, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL
NOTIFY THE LOCAL GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION
OCCURRED IN WRITING WITH:
(1) A SUMMARY OF THE ACTIVITY CONSTITUTING THE VIOLATION;
(2) IF THE VIOLATION IS ONGOING OR LIKELY TO REOCCUR, THE
REMEDIAL MEASURES NECESSARY TO CORRECT THE VIOLATION OR PREVENT A
RECURRENCE OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(3) ANY OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS REASONABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION HAS OCCURRED AND IS LIKELY TO REOCCUR, THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY FILE A CIVIL ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS
SECTION IN THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR ANY COUNTY IN WHICH THE VIOLATION IS
ALLEGED.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY NOT FILE A CIVIL
ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION UNLESS THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL HAS:
1. CONDUCTED AN INVESTIGATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
2. PROVIDED NOTICE AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE FILING
THE COMPLAINT TO THE LOCAL GOVERNING BODY OF THE COUNTY WHERE THE
VIOLATION IS ALLEGED TO HAVE OCCURRED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
3. MADE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO:
A. NOTIFY AN ALLEGED VIOLATOR OF THE VIOLATION;
AND
B. GIVE THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR A REASONABLE
AMOUNT OF TIME TO CORRECT THE VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 1011
(II) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY FILE A CIVIL
ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION WITHOUT COMPLYING WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES
THAT A DELAY IN THE CIVIL ACTION WOULD POSE AN IMMINENT AND SERIOUS
THREAT TO LIFE, HEALTH, OR PUBLIC SAFETY.
(3) AS PART OF A CIVIL ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION, THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL CERTIFY IN WRITING WHETHER THE
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS COMPLIED WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(4) (I) THE COURT MAY AWARD:
1. ECONOMIC AND NONECONOMIC DAMAGES TO ANY
PERSON HARMED BY THE VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
2. DAMAGES FOR THE COST OF ENFORCING THIS
SECTION.
(II) IN ADDITION TO ANY AWARD OF DAMAGES IMPOSED BY THE
COURT, A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY
NOT EXCEEDING $25,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(III) THE COURT MAY GRANT INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO PROHIBIT
A PERSON WHO HAS VIOLATED OR IS VIOLATING THIS SECTION FROM CONTINUING
TO VIOLATE THIS SECTION.
(IV) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
DAMAGES OR PENALTIES AVAILABLE UNDER ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.